Utah statutes.
20A-11-1001.   Electronic form prepared by chief election officer.

The chief election officer shall:

(1)  develop and prepare an electronic form for all financial statements required by this chapter and Chapter 12, Part 2, Judicial Retention Elections; and

(2)  provide access to the electronic form to the secretary of every committee, to every candidate, and to all others who request a form.

